Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,175
Quality assurance; access to records and information.

To fulfill its quality assurance obligations, a health maintenance organization shall have access to treatment records and other information pertaining to the diagnosis, treatment, or health status of any enrollee.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 84.